Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2125
Sections, how construed.

Sections 13-914 and 39-2101 to 39-2125 shall be construed as an independent act, complete in itself, and in the event of conflict between any provisions of sections 13-914 and 39-2101 to 39-2125 and any other statutes, the provisions of sections 13-914 and 39-2101 to 39-2125 shall control.

Laws 1969, c. 312, § 25, p. 1128;

Laws 1983, LB 10, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB277, § 6.